Maine, session 132, LD702.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §150-W is enacted to read:
§150-W. A Day to Remember
January 6th of each year is designated as A Day to Remember, and the Governor shall
annually issue a proclamation honoring the resilience of democracy during the events of
January 6, 2021 in Washington, D.C., encouraging the people of the State to use the day as
an opportunity for reflection on the values of democracy, civic responsibility and the
importance of protecting constitutional governance and encouraging educational
institutions, civic organizations and public libraries to observe the day with discussions,
events and programming to educate citizens about the importance of civic engagement and
the rule of law.
Page 1 - 132LR1795(03)